California statutes. Water Code
(b) “District” means any irrigation district which includes land included within a watermaster service area for which a watermaster has previously been appointed by the Department of Water Resources, but which elects to provide watermaster service pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22080.5.

Any duty or authority vested in a watermaster appointed by a district may be exercised by the watermaster directly or through the agency of a deputy watermaster if there is one.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22081.

A district, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 22080, may appoint one or more watermasters to regulate the use of water within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22081.5.

The owner of every conduit subject to regulation by an irrigation district shall construct and maintain to the satisfaction of the district a substantial and serviceable diversion dam or works in the channel of the stream from which the water is diverted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22082.

The owner of a conduit shall construct and maintain to the satisfaction of the district a substantial and serviceable headgate in the conduit through which the water is diverted at or near the diversion dam or works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22082.5.

The headgate shall be of such construction that it can be locked and kept closed by the watermaster.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22083.

The owner of a conduit shall construct and maintain such water flow measuring devices at such points along the conduit as may be required and approved by the district for the purpose of assisting the watermaster in determining the amounts of water which are being diverted and applied to beneficial use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22083.5.

If the owner of any conduit refuses or neglects to construct and maintain the diversion dam or works, the headgate, or the measuring devices provided for in this article after 30 days’ notice by the district so to do, the watermaster may close the conduit, and it shall not be opened or any water diverted from the source of supply until the requirements of the district as to the diversion dam or works, the headgate, or the measuring devices have been complied with.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22084.

The owner of every reservoir which is subject to regulation by a watermaster and which is located across or upon the bed of a natural stream or requires the use of a natural stream channel shall construct and maintain such measuring devices below the reservoir in the stream and such measuring devices above the reservoir on each stream or source of supply discharging into the reservoir as may be required and approved by the district for the purpose of assisting the district or the watermaster in determining the amounts of water to which the owner is entitled and the amounts of water which the owner is diverting, storing, and applying to beneficial use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22084.5.

If the owner of any reservoir neglects or refuses to construct and maintain the measuring devices provided for in this article after 30 days’ notice by the district, the watermaster may open the outlet of the reservoir and the outlet shall not be closed, except by order of the district, until the requirements of the district as to the measuring devices are complied with.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22085.

The district may make such reasonable regulations to secure distribution of water in accordance with determined rights as may be needed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22085.5.

The watermaster shall divide the water of the streams or other sources of supply among the several conduits and reservoirs taking water therefrom and so adjust or close the headgates of conduits and regulate the controlling works of reservoirs as may be necessary to insure a distribution of the water among the water users entitled to its use, according to the rights of the users.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22086.

Whenever in pursuance of his duties the watermaster regulates a headgate to a conduit or the controlling works of a reservoir, he may attach to the headgate or controlling works a written notice properly dated and signed setting forth the fact that the headgate or controlling works have been properly regulated and are wholly under his control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22086.5.

The notice is legal notice to all persons interested in the diversion and distribution of the water of the conduit or reservoir.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22087.

Any person who is injured by the action of any watermaster may apply to the superior court of the county in which the injury takes place for an injunction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22087.5.

Such injunction shall be issued only in case it is shown at the hearing that the watermaster has failed to distribute the water according to the rights as determined by decrees of court, agreements, permits, or licenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22088.

Every person who willfully and without authority closes, changes, or interferes with any headgate, waterbox, or measuring device while it is under the control of the watermaster, or who willfully takes or uses water which has been denied him by the watermaster under the provisions of this part is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22088.5.

The possession or use of water when it has been so denied by the watermaster is prima facie evidence of the guilt of the person using it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22089.

Every person who violates any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25), nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22089.5.

A watermaster has the power to arrest any person violating any of the provisions of this article and to give him into the custody of the sheriff or other competent police officer within the county, and immediately thereafter make a complaint before a magistrate against the person so arrested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Drainage [22095. - 22099.]

22095.

A district may provide for any and all drainage made necessary by the irrigation provided for by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22096.

All laws respecting irrigation by districts or respecting districts shall also be so construed and enforced as to apply to drainage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22097.

The officers, agents, and employees of districts have the same powers, duties, and liabilities respecting drainage and construction, operation, and control relating to it as they have respecting irrigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22098.

Whenever it appears necessary to drain any land within a district on account of the irrigation which has been done or which is intended to be done by the district under laws relating to it, whether for the purpose of more beneficially carrying on the irrigation or to protect the district from liability by reason of the irrigation, its board, if it is reasonable from an economic standpoint that the drainage be provided, shall provide for the drainage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22099.

No drainage need be provided for land as to which the district is relieved from liability for seepage or flooding by reason of grant, waiver, prescription, statute, decree, or condemnation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Electric Power [22115. - 22124.]

22115.

Any district heretofore or hereafter formed may purchase or lease electric power from any agency or entity, public or private, and may provide for the acquisition, operation, leasing, and control of plants for the generation, transmission, distribution, sale, and lease of electric power, including sale to municipalities, public utility districts, or persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22116.

All provisions of the California Irrigation District Act, and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, applying to irrigation shall, as codified in this division, also be so construed and enforced as to apply to electric power.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 687.)
-------------------------------------------

22117.

The officers, agents, and employees of districts have the same powers, duties, and liabilities respecting electric power and the acquisition, operation, and control relating to it as they have respecting irrigation or districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22118.

The board and the officers, agents, and employees of districts shall do all necessary and proper acts for the construction and operation of its electric power works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22119.

A district may distribute power without regard to any assessments levied by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22120.

A district may sell, dispose of, and distribute electric power for use outside of its boundaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 687.)
-------------------------------------------

22121.

Subject to the conditions in this article a district may in the manner required by law make special appropriations of water for power purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22122.

Any use of water for generating electric power at any given time of the year which is in excess of the water appropriated and beneficially used for irrigation purposes by the district at that period of the year shall be subject to all prior existing appropriations by any municipal corporation which is proceeding in good faith in the expenditure of money and the construction of works designed to divert the water appropriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22123.

Any district providing electric power to areas outside its boundaries shall be subject to reasonable rules, regulations, and orders of the governing body of the city or county area being served, but, in no event, more restrictive than the rules, regulations, and orders of the Public Utilities Commission upon utilities providing electric power to cities or counties. No district may impose rates, rules, regulations, or orders in any such area outside its boundaries which are different from rates, rules, regulations, or orders imposed within the district, except with the consent of the governing body of the affected area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

22124.

Every district furnishing electrical power shall comply with Section 8029.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 549, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Pension and Retirement Systems [22140. - 22144.]

22140.

The board may establish or modify any existing plan or system, so as to provide for a pension or retirement plan or system for the benefit of officers, including directors, and employees of the district and therein provide for the payment of annuities, pensions, retirement benefits, disability payments and death benefits or any one or more of them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 726.)
-------------------------------------------

22141.

The district may maintain its own pension, retirement, disability benefit and death benefit fund or may provide for benefits to eligible officers and employees, or their beneficiaries, by means of group insurance, group annuities or other insurance, or by such means as in the opinion of the board will satisfactorily provide an adequate and sure method of meeting the payments contemplated by its plan or system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 726.)
-------------------------------------------

22143.

This article does not affect the authority of any district to participate in the State Employees’ Retirement System or any county employees’ retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 726.)
-------------------------------------------

22144.

If a district has terminated a plan which did provide retirement benefits and has entered into a contract to participate in the Public Employees’ Retirement System, it may adopt a plan to increase retirement benefits for former employees who had retired prior to provision being made in the contract with the Public Employees’ Retirement System for past service credit. Such plan shall be designed to provide increased retirement benefits based on cost-of-living changes as determined by the board. Payments shall be from the general fund of the district and shall be limited to the benefits set forth in the terminated plan, plus the cost-of-living increases determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 840.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Flood Control [22160. - 22162.]

22160.

The district may, but shall not be required to, provide for, maintain and operate such works and facilities within or without its boundaries as the board may deem necessary to protect the land in, and the property of, the district, from damage by flood or overflow, and may pay the cost and expense thereof out of its general fund or any special fund provided therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

22161.

A district may, but shall not be required to, contract with the United States, the State, or any agency or political subdivision thereof, or any person, for the construction, operation or maintenance of works, facilities or operations within or without the district boundaries which the board deems necessary to protect the land in, and property of, the district, from damage by flood or overflow, and may contribute to the cost or expense thereof out of its general fund or any special fund provided therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.

The provisions of Section 22160 apply only to districts containing 200,000 acres or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Sewage Disposal [22170. - 22180.]

22170.

This article applies only if an election is called and held as provided in this article and a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are “Yes.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 340.)
-------------------------------------------

22171.

The board may in its discretion by resolution call an election to be held in the entire district or only in that portion of the district proposed to be served to determine whether the district should provide for sewage disposal service. The ballots shall contain the following statement of the proposal:

“Shall the ____ Irrigation District provide for sewage disposal, or acquire existing sewage disposal facilities, within that portion of its boundaries as hereinafter described not now provided with adequate sewage collection and disposal works.”

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the ballots of any district which is required to obtain the approval of the local agency
 formation commission before it may provide sewage disposal shall contain the following statement of the proposal:

“Shall the ____ Irrigation District provide for sewage disposal, or acquire existing sewage disposal facilities, within that portion of the district, and in the manner, set forth in the proposed application to the ____ Local Agency Formation Commission, dated ____, a copy of which application is on file in the office of the district.”

To the right of or below the proposal, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 42.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22172.

The ballots shall include instructions to voters that are consistent with the requirements of Section 13204 of the Elections Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 44.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22173.

The voters shall vote for or against the proposal by completely selecting the voting target next to either “Yes” or “No,” respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 45.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22174.

Notice of the election shall specify the purpose of the election and the day, hours, and polling places in each precinct for holding the election, and shall be posted in three public places in each election precinct in the area of the district in which the election is to be held for at least 20 days and published in a newspaper published in the county once a week for at least three successive weeks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 199.)
-------------------------------------------

22175.

The election shall be held and the result determined and declared as nearly as practicable in conformity with general district elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22176.

A district, whether heretofore or hereafter formed, may provide for the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of sewage collection and disposal mains, and sewage treatment and disposal facilities for all or any portion of the lands within its boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

22177.

A district may charge reasonable connection charges to defray in whole or in part the cost of providing sewage disposal service and may levy and collect annual or semiannual charges to cover the cost of maintenance and operation of the sewage disposal system. Any charges authorized by this section shall be made only within the area to be served. If the sewage disposal service is provided to only a portion of the district, the area so served shall bear all costs of the maintenance, operation, and administration of such service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 199.)
-------------------------------------------

22178.

All provisions of the California Irrigation District Act, and of all other acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, applying to irrigation shall, as codified in this division, also be so construed and enforced as to apply to sewage disposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

22179.

The officers, agents, and employees of districts have the same powers, duties, and liabilities respecting sewage disposal and the acquisition, operation, and control relating to it as they have respecting irrigation in districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

22180.

The board and the officers, agents, and employees of districts shall do all necessary and proper acts for the construction and operation of its sewage collection and disposal system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Recreational Facilities [22185. - 22186.]

22185.

A district may construct, maintain, and operate recreational facilities in connection with any dams, reservoirs, or other works owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

22186.

A district may fix and assess reasonable charges for the use of the recreational facilities by members of the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Powers [22225. - 22338.]



  ARTICLE 1. Powers Generally [22225. - 22235.]

22225.

Each district has the power generally to perform all acts necessary to carry out fully the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22226.

A district may construct the necessary works for the collection of water for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22227.

A district may acquire the right to store water in any reservoir or to carry water through any conduit not owned or controlled by the district and may grant to any owner or lessee of the right to the use of any water the right to store the water in any reservoir of the district or to carry the water through any conduit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22228.

A district may contract to perform and perform any agreement with any number of persons or public corporations or agencies for the exchange, transfer, or delivery to or by either or both parties of any water right or water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22230.

A district may make and perform any necessary contracts to carry out the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22231.

A district by contract may acquire and operate any needed or desirable equipment to put water under its control to any beneficial use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22232.

A district may employ an expert in agriculture and related matters and other employees as may be deemed necessary to do any of the following:

(a) Supervise the construction of works for the irrigation or protection of land.

(b) Advise the owners of land or any persons engaged in farming the land of methods of increasing the productiveness of the land or as to any matters of husbandry.

(c) Conduct experiments as prescribed by the board.

(d) Perform duties for the general welfare of the people of the district as prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22233.

Any district and any county may enter into a contract agreeing to pay and apportion between them the costs of locating, removing, repairing, or relocating any facilities owned or to be owned by either party on the roads or other property of the other in such proportion and upon such terms as the governing boards of the parties shall determine to be equitable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1879.)
-------------------------------------------

22234.

A district may contract to operate, maintain, or improve ditches and laterals not owned by the district upon petition of at least two-thirds of the owners of land served by such ditches or laterals.

In order to carry out the purposes of this section, a district may make such contracts as the board deems necessary, including but not limited to loan and repayment contracts, construction contracts, and rental of equipment contracts.

The amendment of this section made at the 1963 Regular Session of the Legislature does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the pre-existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 524.)
-------------------------------------------

22235.

A district may disseminate information to the public concerning the rights, properties, and activities of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Water Distribution [22250. - 22264.]

22250.

All water distributed by districts for irrigation purposes shall except when otherwise provided in this article be apportioned ratably to each landowner upon the basis of the ratio which the last assessment against his land for district purposes bears to the whole sum assessed in the district for district purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22251.

Any landowner may assign for use within the district his right to the whole or any portion of the water apportioned to him pursuant to Section 22250.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22252.

When any charges for the use of water are fixed by a district the water for the use of which the charges have been fixed shall be distributed equitably as determined by the board among those offering to make the required payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22252.1.

The board by the unanimous vote of all of the directors may specify a date prior to which applications for water for the ensuing irrigation season are to be received for all crops or for annual crops and new plantings and may require a cash deposit not to exceed the water charge for the water applied for, to be made at the time of application for each acre for which application is made. The cash deposit shall in the discretion of the board be forfeited as to each acre not using the water applied for if the district has water available to supply the same. In the event of water shortage the board may with respect to the shortage area in its discretion give preference to or serve only the land for which application was filed prior to the date set and the land for which no application was required. Any date so fixed shall be effective for each year thereafter unless changed by the board if notice thereof is published not later than April 1st in the year in the manner prescribed for the publication of the notice provided for in Section 22252.2. Nothing in this section shall prohibit apportionment of available water to land given preference under this section or otherwise restrict or limit existing powers of the board to control and provide for distribution of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

22252.2.

The action of a board in fixing or changing any such date shall be ineffective until notice thereof is given by publication once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper published in the district, or if no newspaper is published in the district, then in a newspaper published in the office county, or if no newspaper is published in the office county, then in a newspaper published in any affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

22252.3.

In any year in which the board determines that the water supplies of the district will be inadequate to provide water in a quantity furnished in years of average precipitation, the board may specify a date prior to which applications for water for the ensuing irrigation season are to be received. In districts where meters or other volumetric measuring instruments or facilities are not available or are inadequate to measure substantially all agricultural water deliveries, the district may establish annual water requirements in the district for growing each type of crop grown in the district, accept such applications for water based on proposed crops to be grown and acreage of each such proposed crop, and determine the quantity of water apportioned under Sections 22250, 22251, 22252, and 22252.1 expressed in terms of acreage of each type of proposed crop to be served. In such a district, the district may refuse to deliver water to, or assess penalties on, the landowner who uses such water on a greater acreage of such crops than such landowner’s share of the estimated available water will bring to maturity based on the requirements established for growing such crops in the district.

In establishing annual water requirements for growing particular types of crops, as authorized in this section, the district, with respect to those crops which ordinarily require periodic irrigation, may designate the number of irrigation runs and the amount of water to be allocated to each such run with respect to each crop and may give the water user water credits measured by the designated irrigation runs with respect to each such crop as to which the water user has notified the district he intends to underirrigate.

This section provides a means of measuring the allocation of water to lands based on the type of crop grown and does not authorize a district to designate the crops to be grown on such land.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit or limit the apportionment of available water to land given preference under Section 22252.1 or this section or to otherwise restrict or limit existing powers of the district to control and provide for distribution of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

22253.

When a mutual water company has been formed to furnish water to certain specified land within a district, the district may contract for the delivery of water for the specified land through the mutual water company only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22254.

If a district has contracted to deliver and is delivering water to a mutual water company for distribution to territory served by the latter, the water shall be apportioned on a basis found by the board to be equitable and for the best interests of all persons concerned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22255.

When its board deems it in the best interests of the district, the district may regulate the amount of water to be used to irrigate crops within the district when seepage from the irrigation would damage adjacent land inside or outside of the district or may require as a condition precedent to the delivery of water the construction of adequate drainage facilities to prevent damage to the adjacent land. Whenever the board finds, with respect to land for which there is no existing system for the application of water for the irrigation thereof, that the character of the soil or elevation of the land to be supplied water from the district water supply is such that the application of such water thereto by flooding is likely to require the use of excess quantities of water or to create a hazardous seepage or drainage problem, the board may limit the application of such water to that land to application through overhead sprinkling systems so designed and operated to prevent the use of excess quantities of water, or the creation of a hazardous seepage or drainage problem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1563.)
-------------------------------------------

22256.

A district may refuse to furnish water to any land to which it holds title by virtue of collector’s deeds to the district or to any or all land on which the district has an outstanding unredeemed certificate of sale for the nonpayment of a district assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 673.)
-------------------------------------------

22257.

Each district shall establish equitable rules for the distribution and use of water, which shall be printed in convenient form for distribution in the district. A district may refuse to deliver water through a ditch which is not clean or not in suitable condition to prevent waste of water and may determine through which of two or more available ditches it will deliver water.

A district may close a defective gate in a community water distribution system used for irrigation purposes and may refuse to deliver water through the defective gate if the landowner fails to repair the gate or outlet to the satisfaction of the district within a reasonable time after receipt of notice from the board through its authorized water superintendent, manager or ditch tender to repair the gate or outlet. Rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section may include, with respect to land for which there is no existing system for the application of water for the irrigation thereof, the limitation of the use of water for irrigation furnished by the district to an overhead sprinkling system where such method of irrigation will conserve water and prevent excess seepage or the creation of drainage problems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1563.)
-------------------------------------------

22258.

A district required by law or provisions of agreements under which all or part of the water supply of the district was acquired to furnish water outside its boundaries to consumers whose rights to service were at the time the supply of water was acquired by the district enforceable by reason of their status as persons of the class for whose benefit the water was appropriated or dedicated may regulate the use of water so furnished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22259.

If its board deems it to be for the best interests of the district, a district may enter into a contract for the lease or sale of any surplus water or use of surplus water not then necessary for use within the district, for use either within or without the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22261.

Nothing in this article authorizes the sale of any water right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22262.

No right in any water or water right owned by the district shall be acquired by use permitted under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22263.

Nothing contained in this division authorizes any person to divert the water of any stream or conduit from its channel to the detriment of any person having any interest in the stream, conduit, or the water therein, unless previous compensation be ascertained and paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22264.

Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code shall not apply to districts except in specific areas concerning which the State Department of Health Services gives written notice to the district.

In areas where the service rendered by the district is primarily agricultural and domestic service is only incidental thereto, the State Department of Health Services may prescribe reasonable and feasible action to be taken by the district and the consumers to insure that their domestic water will not be injurious to health.

Municipal and public corporations or utilities, other than a district, that distribute water within a district are not excepted from Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 453.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Charges [22280. - 22284.]

22280.

Any district may in lieu in whole or in part of levying assessments fix and collect charges for any service furnished by the district, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) (1) Use, sale, or lease of water, which may include, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, a standby charge whether the water is actually used or not.

(2) If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the district may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the district shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(b) Delivery of water for irrigation in excess of a specified quantity per unit of land.

(c) Water and the service thereof required by law or provisions of agreements under which all or part of the water supply of the district was acquired to be furnished outside its boundaries to consumers whose rights to service were at the time the supply of water was acquired by the district enforceable by reason of their status as persons of the class for whose benefit the water was appropriated or dedicated.

(d) Use of water for power purposes.

(e) Sale of electric power.

(f) Connections to new pipelines or extensions of existing pipelines required to serve water to lands in the district not adjacent to existing distribution works and which have been constructed in whole or in part at the expense of the district.

(g) Services performed under contracts made pursuant to Section 22234.

(h) Use of water for groundwater recharge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

22281.

A district may charge higher rates for the service of water to any land that is not subject to assessment by the district than is charged other land in the district for similar service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22281.1.

A district may establish a charge for the right to connect to new pipelines or extensions of existing pipelines constructed in whole or in part at the expense of the district in such amounts as in the opinion of the board will reimburse the district for the cost of construction advanced by the district.

The connection charge shall be as nearly as possible an amount equal to that proportion of the cost of construction of the new pipeline or extension that the area to be served by the connection bears to the total area to be served by the new pipeline or extension.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1180.)
-------------------------------------------

22282.

Whenever any charges for any service provided for by this division have been fixed, they may be made payable in advance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22282.1.

A district may refuse service to any land if outstanding charges for services already rendered such land have not been paid within a reasonable time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 673.)
-------------------------------------------

22283.

A district may prescribe reasonable rules to carry out the provisions of this article.
